src/verb.lexc
LEXICON 222
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 221
+Neg+Aor:+mA	209;
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	220;
+Neg:+mA	204;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	211;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+yAmA	#;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	219;

LEXICON 220
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 219
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	214;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	212;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Opt:+yA	218;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	216;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	213;
+Prog2:+mAktA	217;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	215;

LEXICON 218
+A1pl:+lHm	#;

LEXICON 217
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 216
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 215
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;

LEXICON 214
+A1sg:+yHm	#;

LEXICON 213
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 212
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 211
(+z)	210;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 210
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 209
(+z)	208;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3pl:+zlAr	205;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 208
+A3pl:+lAr	207;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	206;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 207
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 206
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 205
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 204
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	202;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	198;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	196;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	194;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	199;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	197;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	203;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	201;

LEXICON 203
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 202
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 201
+Aor:+Hr	200;

LEXICON 200
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 199
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 198
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 197
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 196
+A3pl:+lAr	195;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 195
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 194
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 193
+A2sg:0		#;
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A2pl:+yHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+sHnlAr	#;
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 192
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	191;
+Neg:+mA	186;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	188;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos:+Hl	187;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	190;

LEXICON 191
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A3pl:+sHnlAr	#;
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 190
+Neg:+mA	189;

LEXICON 189
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;

LEXICON 188
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;

LEXICON 187
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 186
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;

LEXICON 185
+Aor+A3sg:+Ar	125;
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	143;
+Aor+A3sg:+r	111;
+Aor:+Ar	149;
+Aor:+Hr	100;
+Aor:+r	159;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Ar	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+r	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+Ar	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+r	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+Ar	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+r	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+Ar	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+r	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Ar	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+r	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Cond:+sA	102;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	155;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	96;
+Imp:0		193;
+Imp:+sA	103;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	126;
+Narr:+mHS	142;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	110;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Opt:+yA	162;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	124;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	119;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	106;
^DB+Adj+Agt:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Adj+Agt^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Adj+Agt^DB+Verb+Zero:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Adj+FeelLike:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Verb+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+Adamantly:+yAsHyA	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+SinceDoingSo:+yAlH	#;
^DB+Adverb+SinceDoingSo^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAlH	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+When^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutBeingAbleToHaveDoneSo:+yAmAdAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAksHzHn	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf+A3sg+Pnon:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf+A3sg:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+Prop+A3sg+Pnon:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+Prop+A3sg:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+FeelLike+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Noun+FeelLike+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Noun+FeelLike+A3sg+Pnon:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Noun+FeelLike+A3sg:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Noun+FeelLike+Prop+A3sg+Pnon:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Noun+FeelLike+Prop+A3sg:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Noun+FeelLike:+yAsH	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+Prop+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+Prop+A3sg:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+Prop+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+Prop+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+Prop+A3sg+Pnon:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+Prop+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg+Pnon:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+Prop+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+Prop+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able+Imp:+yAbil	182;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	181;
^DB+Verb+EverSince:+yAgel	152;
^DB+Verb+Hastily+Imp+A2sg:+yHver	#;
^DB+Verb+Hastily+Imp:+yHver	134;
^DB+Verb+Hastily:+yHver	133;
^DB+Verb+Repeat+Imp:+yAdur	101;
^DB+Verb+Stay:+yAkal	184;

LEXICON 184
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	183;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 183
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 182
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 181
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	174;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	178;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	170;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	165;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	163;
+Opt:+yA	176;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	175;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	168;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	180;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 180
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Cop:+dHr	179;

LEXICON 179
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 178
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	177;

LEXICON 177
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 176
+A1pl:+lHm	#;

LEXICON 175
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 174
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A1sg:+Hm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	173;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	172;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	171;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 173
+Cond:+ysA	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 172
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 171
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 170
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	169;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 169
+Cop:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 168
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	167;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	166;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 167
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;

LEXICON 166
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 165
+A3pl:+lAr	164;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 164
+Cop:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 163
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 162
+A1pl:+lHm	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	161;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	160;

LEXICON 161
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 160
+A2sg:+n	#;

LEXICON 159
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A1sg:+Hm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	158;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	157;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	156;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 158
+Cond:+ysA	#;
+Narr:+mHS	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 157
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;

LEXICON 156
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;

LEXICON 155
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	154;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	153;

LEXICON 154
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 153
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 152
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	151;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	150;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 151
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 150
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;
